Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-403
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Health Care Facility Licensure Act, unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions found in sections 71-404 to 71-431 shall apply.

Laws 2000, LB 819, § 3;

Laws 2007, LB203, § 2;

Laws 2010, LB849, § 20;

Laws 2015, LB37, § 69;

Laws 2016, LB698, § 18;

Laws 2018, LB731, § 93;

Laws 2018, LB1034, § 51;

Laws 2020, LB1052, § 6;

Laws 2020, LB1053, § 4;

Laws 2022, LB697, § 2;

Laws 2023, LB227, § 71.